en: Organic certification: Fair Trade; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Other
nl: Biologische certificering: Fair Trade; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Overig
it: Certificazione biologica: Fair Trade; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Altro
hu: Ökológiai tanúsítvány: Fair Trade; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Egyéb
fr: Certification biologique: Commerce équitable; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Autre
vi: Chứng nhận hữu cơ: Thương mại công bằng; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Khác
ro-RO: Certificare organică: Fair Trade; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Altele
hr-HR: Ekološki certifikat: Fair Trade; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Ostalo
pt-PT: Certificação biológica: Comércio justo; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Outro
sl-SI: Ekološki certifikat: Pravična trgovina; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Drugo
nb: Økologisk sertifisering: Fairtrade; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Annet
pt-BR: Certificação orgânica: Comércio Justo; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Outro
sv: Ekologisk certifiering: Fair Trade; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Övrigt
el: Βιολογική πιστοποίηση: Δίκαιο εμπόριο; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Άλλο
zh-CN: 有机认证: 公平贸易; GOTS; 非转基因项目; USDA 有机认证; 其他
ja: オーガニック認証: フェアトレード; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDAオーガニック; その他
bg-BG: Биологичен сертификат: Справедлива търговия; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Друго
cs: Ekologická certifikace: Fair Trade; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Jiné
lt-LT: Ekologinis sertifikavimas: Sąžininga prekyba; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Kita
tr: Organik sertifikası: Adil Ticaret; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Diğer
sk-SK: Ekologická certifikácia: Fair Trade; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Iné
es: Certificación orgánica: Comercio justo; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Otro
zh-TW: 有機認證: 公平貿易; GOTS; 非基因改造專案; USDA 有機; 其他
pl: Certyfikat ekologiczny: Fair Trade; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Inne
ru: Органическая сертификация: Справедливая торговля; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Другое
th: ใบรับรองออร์แกนิก: Fair Trade; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; อื่นๆ
de: Bio-Zertifizierung: Fair Trade; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Sonstige
da: Økologisk certificering: Fair Trade; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Andet
ko: 유기농 인증: 공정무역; GOTS; Non-GMO 프로젝트; USDA 유기농; 기타
fi: Luomusertifikaatti: Reilu kauppa; GOTS; Non-GMO Project; USDA Organic; Muu